Montana, session 2025, SB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 85-7-1702, MCA, is amended to read:
"85-7-1702. Election of commissioners -- term of office. (1) The election for commissioners in
each district must be held annually in accordance with Title 13, chapter 1, part 5. The election may be at the
district's annual meeting or on the date established in 13-1-504(1).
(2) A person who resides in and is eligible to vote in the district may file a declaration of candidacy
for the office of commissioner with the election administrator or deputy election administrator within the time
period specified in 13-1-502.
(3) Within 40 days following their election, the commissioners shall meet and organize as a board
by electing a president from their number and a secretary, who may or may not be a commissioner, who shall
each hold office at the pleasure of the board.
(4) Except as provided in 85-7-204, the term of office of each commissioner begins on the date of
the commissioner's election and continues for 3 years.
(5) Commissioners are elected by the electors of the entire district division they have land in for
which they are running. Only the acres in that division of the district can vote for that candidate."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 517